Washington statutes.
RCW 16.30.070

Enforcement of provisions.

(1) The animal control authority and its staff and agents, local law enforcement agents, and county sheriffs are authorized and empowered to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(2) If a locality does not have a local animal control authority, the department of fish and wildlife shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 238 s 8.]